Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Article 9. Accidents and Reports.

§ 63-3-401.
Duties of driver involved in accident resulting in personal injury or death; offenses and penalties.

The driver of any vehicle involved in an accident resulting in injury to or death of any person shall immediately stop such vehicle at the scene of such accident or as close thereto as possible but shall then forthwith return to and in every event shall remain at the scene of the accident until he has fulfilled the requirements of Section 63-3-405.

Every stop under the provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall be made without obstructing traffic or endangering the life of any person more than is necessary.

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, if any driver of a vehicle involved in an accident that results in injury to any person willfully fails to stop or to comply with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, then such person, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than thirty (30) days nor more than one (1) year, or by fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or by both such fine and imprisonment.

If any driver of a vehicle involved in an accident that results in the death of another or the mutilation, disfigurement, permanent disability or the destruction of the tongue, eye, lip, nose or any other limb, organ or member of another willfully fails to stop or to comply with the requirements under the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, then such person, upon conviction, shall be guilty of a felony and shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than five (5) nor more than twenty (20) years, or by fine of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or by both such fine and imprisonment.

The commissioner shall revoke the driver’s license of any person convicted under this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8161; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1996, ch. 461, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 374, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 63-3-403.
Duties of driver involved in accident resulting in property damage to attended vehicle; offenses and penalties.

The driver of any vehicle involved in an accident resulting only in damage to a vehicle which is driven or attended by any person shall immediately stop such vehicle at the scene of such accident or as close thereto as possible but shall forthwith return to and in every event shall remain at the scene of such accident until he has fulfilled the requirements of Section 63-3-405. Every such stop shall be made without obstructing traffic more than is necessary.

Any person failing to stop or comply with said requirements under such circumstances shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8162; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-405.
Duty of driver involved in accident resulting in injury or death or property damage to give information and render aid; liability for rendering assistance.

The driver of any vehicle involved in an accident resulting in injury to or death of any person or damage to any vehicle which is driven or attended by any person shall give his name, address and the registration number of the vehicle he is driving and shall, upon request and if available, exhibit his operator’s or chauffeur’s license to the person struck or the driver or occupant of or person attending any vehicle collided with. Said driver shall render to any person injured in such accident reasonable assistance, including the carrying, or the making of arrangements for the carrying, of such person to a physician, surgeon or hospital for medical or surgical treatment if it is apparent that such treatment is necessary or if such carrying is requested by the injured person. No such driver who, in good faith and in the exercise of reasonable care, renders emergency care to any injured person at the scene of an accident or in transporting said injured person to a point where medical assistance can be reasonably expected, shall be liable for any civil damages to said injured person as a result of any acts committed in good faith and in the exercise of reasonable care or omission in good faith and in the exercise of reasonable care by such driver in rendering the emergency care to said injured person.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8163; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1979, ch. 376, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 63-3-407.
Duties of driver involved in accident involving unattended vehicle.

The driver of any vehicle which collides with any vehicle which is unattended shall immediately stop and shall then and there either locate and notify the operator or owner of such vehicle of the name and address of the driver and owner of the vehicle striking the unattended vehicle or shall leave in a conspicuous place in the vehicle struck a written notice giving the name and address of the driver and of the owner of the vehicle doing the striking and a statement of the circumstances thereof. However, the provisions herein shall not apply where no material damage is done and where the owner of the unattended vehicle was guilty of negligence in leaving said vehicle parked as same was when so struck.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8164; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-409.
Duties of driver striking fixtures upon or adjacent to highway.

The driver of any vehicle involved in an accident resulting only in damages to fixtures legally upon or adjacent to a highway shall take reasonable steps to locate and notify the owner or person in charge of such property of such fact and of his name and address and of the registration number of the vehicle he is driving and shall upon request and if available exhibit his operator’s or chauffeur’s license and shall make report of such accident when and as required in Section 63-3-411.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8165; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-411.
Duties of drivers involved in accidents involving injury or death or property damage of $500 or more to report accidents; supplemental reports; investigations and reports by law enforcement officers.

The driver of a vehicle involved in an accident resulting in injury to or death of any person or total property damage to an apparent extent of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or more shall immediately, by the quickest means of communication, give notice of the collision to the local police department if the collision occurs within an incorporated municipality, or if the collision occurs outside of an incorporated municipality to the nearest sheriff’s office or highway patrol station.

The department may require any driver of a vehicle involved in an accident, of which report must be made as provided in this section, to file supplemental reports whenever the original report is insufficient in the opinion of the department. Additionally, the department may require witnesses of accidents to render reports to the department.

It shall be the duty of the highway patrol or the sheriff’s office to investigate all accidents required to be reported by this section when the accident occurs outside the corporate limits of a municipality, and it shall be the duty of the police department of each municipality to investigate all accidents required to be reported by this section when the accidents occur within the corporate limits of the municipality.

Every law enforcement officer who investigates an accident as required by this subsection, whether the investigation is made at the scene of the accident or by subsequent investigation and interviews, shall forward within six (6) days after completing the investigation a written report of the accident to the department if the accident occurred outside the corporate limits of a municipality, or to the police department of the municipality if the accident occurred within the corporate limits of such municipality. Police departments shall forward such reports to the department within six (6) days of the date of the accident.

Whenever an engineer of a railroad locomotive, or other person in charge of a train, is required to show proof of his identity under the provisions of this article, in connection with operation of such locomotive, to any law enforcement officer, such person shall not be required to display his operator’s or chauffeur’s license but shall display his railroad employee number.

In addition to the information required on the “statewide uniform traffic accident report” forms provided by Section 63-3-415, the department shall require the parties involved in an accident and the witnesses of such accident to furnish their phone numbers in order to assist the investigation by law enforcement officers.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8166; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1976, ch. 446, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 326, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 441, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 563, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 485, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2003.

§ 63-3-413.
Reporting of accident by occupant of vehicle when driver incapable of reporting.

Whenever the driver of a vehicle is physically incapable of making a required accident report and there was another occupant in the vehicle at the time of the accident capable of making a report, such occupant shall make or cause to be made said report.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8167; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-415.
Accident report forms.

The department shall prepare and furnish “statewide uniform traffic accident report” forms to other agencies, municipal police departments, county sheriffs and other suitable law enforcement agencies or individuals. The department may charge an amount not exceeding the actual costs incurred by the department in preparing and furnishing the forms. The Department of Public Safety also may make such forms available in electronic format, which shall be accessible by law enforcement departments and other agencies without charge.

Every accident report required by Section 63-3-411 from a law enforcement officer or individual shall be made on the statewide uniform traffic accident report form provided by the department.

In addition to the information required on the accident report forms provided for herein, the department shall include a place on such report forms for the phone numbers of the parties involved in the accident and any witnesses to such accident.

“Statewide uniform traffic accident report” forms shall not have printed upon them the name of any elected state official.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8168; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1984, ch. 485; Laws, 1986, ch. 459, § 36; Laws, 1990, ch. 441, § 2; Laws, 2002, ch. 446, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 63-3-417.
Disclosure of information in accident reports; fraudulently obtaining information contained in report; penalties.

All required accident reports and supplemental reports shall be without prejudice to the individual so reporting and, except as otherwise provided in this section, shall be for the confidential use of the department; however, the department may, upon written request of any person involved in an accident, the spouse or next of kin of any such person, or any person against whom a claim is made as a result of the accident or upon written request of the representative of his estate, disclose to such requester or his legal counsel or a representative of his insurer any information contained in such report except the parties’ version of the accident as set out in the written report filed by such parties, or may disclose the identity of a person involved in an accident when such identity is not otherwise known or when such person denies his presence at such accident. The admissibility of an accident report into evidence in any court shall be governed by the Mississippi Rules of Evidence. However, the department shall furnish, upon demand of any person who has, or claims to have, made such a report or, upon demand of any court, a certificate showing that a specified accident report has or has not been made to the department solely to prove a compliance or a failure to comply with the requirement that such a report be made to the department.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section or the provisions of any other law to the contrary, the department may supply vehicle-specific accident data to any person or entity, in bulk electronic form, for the purpose of compiling vehicle history reports for use by law enforcement, consumers and businesses. The department may charge and collect fees at a negotiated price established by the department for providing such data; however, the department may not agree to grant to any person or entity an exclusive right to receive information or data under this subsection. A person or entity that requests access to such data must agree, in writing, to use information obtained from such data only for the purpose of identifying vehicles that have been involved in accidents and any damage to those vehicles. A person or entity obtaining such data may not use such information to identify or contact persons or individuals.

The department shall retain and deposit into a special fund that is hereby created in the State Treasury so much of the fees collected as may be necessary to defray the actual costs that the department incurs in retrieving, furnishing and maintaining the records and data requested under this subsection. Monies in the special fund may be expended, upon legislative appropriation, to defray such costs. Unexpended amounts remaining in the special fund at the end of the fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any income earned or investment earnings on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. That portion of the fees collected in excess of the amount necessary to defray the actual costs that the department incurs in retrieving, furnishing and maintaining the records and data requested under this subsection shall be deposited in the State General Fund as provided under Section 45-1-23.

The report required by Section 63-3-411 may be used in proving uninsured status of the owner and operator of a vehicle in any action to enforce a claim under the uninsured motorist provisions of an automobile liability policy, but only as provided in Section 13-1-124.

Any person to whom information contained in an accident report is not authorized to be disclosed under this section who fraudulently obtains or fraudulently attempts to obtain a copy of such report or information contained in such report shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and such person, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not more than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00), or imprisonment in the county jail for a term of not more than six (6) months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8170; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1981, ch. 361, § 2; Laws, 1985, ch. 303; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 116; Laws, 2005, ch. 313, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 314, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 492, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 63-3-419.
Reporting by hospitals and medical examiners of deaths from motor vehicle accidents.

Every county medical examiner or county medical examiner investigator shall, on or before the tenth day of each month, report in writing to the department the death of any person within his jurisdiction during the preceding calendar month as the result of an accident involving a motor vehicle and the circumstances of such accident.

Every hospital shall notify the county medical examiner or county medical examiner investigator of the county in which the accident occurred of the death within the hospital of any person who dies as a result of injuries apparently sustained in an accident involving a motor vehicle.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8169; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1976, ch. 446, § 2; Laws, 1986, ch. 459, § 37, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

§ 63-3-421.
Tabulation and analysis of accident reports.

The department shall receive accident reports required by this article, and shall tabulate and may analyze all accident reports and shall publish annually or at more frequent intervals statistical information based thereon as to the number and circumstances of traffic accidents.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8171; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1976, ch. 446, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

§ 63-3-423.
Requirement of accident reports by municipal corporations; confidentiality of reports.

Any incorporated city, town, village, or other municipality, may by ordinance require that the driver of a vehicle involved in an accident shall also file with a designated city department a report of such accident or a copy of any report required under this article to be filed with the department. Any such report shall be for the confidential use of the city department and shall be subject to the provisions of Section 63-3-417.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8172; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.